Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
TUITION CLASSIFICATION

23-7.4-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Domicile" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-7-102 (2).

"Institution" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-7-102 (6).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 782, § 1, effective August 8.

23-7.4-202. Tuition classification of Colorado National Guard personnel.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 7.4 or article 7 of this title 23 to the contrary, a member of the Colorado National Guard who maintains his or her sole residence in Colorado, or the dependent of that member of the Colorado National Guard, has in-state tuition status at any institution of higher education in this state. Such member of the Colorado National Guard has in-state tuition status regardless of whether he or she is eligible for or is receiving tuition assistance pursuant to section 23-7.4-302.

A student who is classified as an in-state student solely pursuant to this section is not counted as a resident for any purpose other than tuition classification.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 783, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-7-108 as it existed prior to 2018.

23-7.4-203. Tuition classification of armed forces veterans.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 7.4 or article 7 of this title 23 to the contrary, beginning with the fall semester of the 2009-2010 academic year, the governing board of each state institution of higher education in Colorado shall adopt a policy that grants in-state tuition status to an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the United States and a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section 28-5-100.3, who enrolls in the state institution of higher education and who meets, for any length of time, the presumptions and rules for maintaining a domicile in Colorado described in section 23-7-103.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 7.4 or article 7 of this title 23 to the contrary, beginning with the fall semester of the 2009-2010 academic year, the governing board of each state institution of higher education in Colorado may adopt a policy that grants in-state tuition status to a dependent of an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the United States or a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section 28-5-100.3, who enrolls in the state institution of higher education if the honorably discharged member of the armed forces or discharged LGBT veteran meets, for any length of time, the presumptions and rules for maintaining a domicile in Colorado described in section 23-7-103.

A student who is classified as an in-state student solely pursuant to this section is not counted as a resident for any purpose other than tuition classification; except that, beginning with the fall semester of the 2011-2012 academic year, upon classification as an in-state student pursuant to this section, the student is also eligible to receive a stipend from the college opportunity fund pursuant to part 2 of article 18 of this title 23.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 783, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 175, § 8, effective November 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-7-108.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-7.4-204. Tuition classification for veterans pursuant to federal law.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 7.4 or article 7 of this title 23 to the contrary, beginning with any courses enrolled as of July 1, 2015, the governing board of each state institution of higher education shall adopt a policy granting in-state tuition status to "covered individuals", as defined in section 702 of the federal "Veterans Access, Choice, and Accountability Act of 2014", 38 U.S.C. sec. 3679, as may be amended, and as determined by the United States department of veterans affairs.

A covered individual must be classified as an in-state student for tuition purposes if:

The covered individual resides in Colorado while enrolled in the institution, regardless of the length of time the covered individual resided in Colorado prior to enrolling in the institution; and

The covered individual enrolls in courses with educational assistance benefits pursuant to chapter 30 or 33 of U.S.C. title 38.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section to the contrary, a student who qualified as a covered individual and who has exhausted his or her educational assistance benefits pursuant to chapter 30 or 33 of U.S.C. title 38 must continue to be classified as an in-state student for tuition purposes so long as the student continues to reside in Colorado and remains continuously enrolled in the same institution.

Beginning July 1, 2015, upon classification pursuant to this section, the covered individual is also eligible to receive a stipend from the college opportunity fund pursuant to part 2 of article 18 of this title 23.

A covered individual that is classified as an in-state student solely pursuant to this section is not counted as a resident student for any other purpose other than tuition classification.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 783, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-7-108.6 as it existed prior to 2018.

23-7.4-205. Tuition classification for community college - definitions.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 7.4 or article 7 of this title 23 to the contrary, on or before January 1, 2021, the state board for community colleges and occupational education shall adopt and implement a policy granting in-state tuition status at a community college for an active member of the armed forces of the United States or a veteran of the armed forces of the United States, or a dependent of said member or veteran, regardless of whether the person satisfies Colorado domicile or residency status.

A person who is eligible for in-state tuition status pursuant to this section is not counted as a resident for any purpose other than tuition classification, except as provided by subsection (2)(b) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section or any provision to the contrary, on or before January 1, 2021, a person who is classified for in-state tuition status pursuant to this section is eligible to receive a stipend from the college opportunity fund pursuant to part 2 of article 18 of this title 23.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Community college" means a community college described in section 23-60-205 that is governed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education.

"Dependent" means either:

A spouse of an active member of the armed forces of the United States or a veteran, living or deceased, of the armed forces of the United States, at the time the spouse is requesting in-state tuition classification; or

A child under twenty-three years of age either born to or legally adopted by an active member of the armed forces of the United States or a veteran, living or deceased, of the armed forces of the United States.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1275), ch. 95, p. 374, § 1, effective September 14.